Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Trooper R Class

16.196.
Trooper R Class and commercial vehicle enforcement officer R Class positions created within department.

There is created within the Department of Kentucky State Police the positions of Trooper R Class and commercial vehicle enforcement officer R class that shall be utilized by the commissioner to retain retired officers commissioned under this chapter on a contractual basis to supplement the ranks of the Kentucky State Police and commercial vehicle enforcement officers.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 59, § 12, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 64, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/25/2009). 2009 Ky. Acts ch. 75 sec. 1, provided that a new KRS Chapter 16A was established and a new section thereof was to be created for this statute. In codification, the Reviser of Statutes has instead created new sections of existing KRS Chapter 16 for 2009 Ky. Acts. ch. 75, secs. 1 to 10, under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(a).

16.197.
Qualifications of individual employed as a Trooper R Class or a commercial vehicle enforcement officer R Class.

An individual employed as a Trooper R Class or a commercial vehicle enforcement officer R class shall:

Be a retired officer who prior to retirement was commissioned as an officer under this chapter;

Be a retired member of the State Police Retirement System established by KRS

16.505

to

16.652

or the Kentucky Employees Retirement System established by KRS

61.510

to

61.705

, who retired with at least twenty (20) years of service credit;

Upon appointment to Trooper R Class or commercial vehicle enforcement officer R class, have been separated from the service of the Department of Kentucky State Police for a period no less than one (1) month nor greater than sixty (60) months following the individual’s effective retirement date from the State Police Retirement System or the Kentucky Employees Retirement System;

Have retired willingly with no administrative charges against the officer pending under KRS

16.140

or

16.192

; and

Have retired with no pre-existing agreement between the employee and the department prior to the employee’s retirement for the employee to return to work with the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 59, § 13, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 64, § 2, effective June 25, 2013.

16.198.
Appointment, salary, benefits, conditions of employment, and number of individuals employed as a Trooper R Class or a CVE R Class — Administrative regulations.

The appointment, salary, benefits, and number of individuals employed as a Trooper R Class and CVE R class shall be as follows:

The commissioner may appoint CVE R Class employees. CVE R Class employees shall serve on a contractual basis for a term of one (1) year, and the contract may be renewed annually, by agreement of the parties, for no more than nine (9) additional one (1) year terms. A CVE R Class employee shall be required to pass a physical fitness test every three (3) years.

The commissioner may appoint Trooper R Class employees who shall serve on a contractual basis for a term of one (1) year. The contract may be renewed on an annual basis upon the agreement of both parties. A Trooper R Class employee shall be required to pass a physical fitness test every three (3) years.

The compensation for Trooper R Class employees and CVE R Class employees shall be established by administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.

All appointments of individuals employed as a Trooper R Class and CVE R Class shall be based upon agency need as determined by the commissioner.

Work stations for individuals employed as a Trooper R Class and CVE R Class shall be determined by agency need with consideration given to the applicant’s stated preference.

Merit of individuals employed as a Trooper R Class and CVE R Class shall be determined by the applicant’s work performance history.

Fitness of individuals employed as a Trooper R Class and CVE R Class shall be determined by the applicant’s ability to adhere to the agency standards set by the commissioner under this chapter.

The number of individuals employed as a Trooper R Class and CVE R Class by the department shall not:

Exceed one hundred (100); or

Be counted in the total employee cap for the department.

All individuals employed as a Trooper R Class and CVE R Class shall be assigned the job duties of trooper or commercial vehicle enforcement officer and shall not be placed in any supervisory positions.

Notwithstanding any provision of KRS

16.505

to

16.652

, KRS

18A.005

to

18A.228

, and KRS

61.510

to

61.705

to the contrary:

Individuals employed as a Trooper R Class and CVE R Class shall continue to receive all retirement and health insurance benefits provided by the systems administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems to which they were entitled upon retiring from the department as a commissioned officer under this chapter;

Individuals employed as a Trooper R Class and CVE R Class shall not be eligible to receive health insurance coverage or benefits through the department and shall not be eligible to participate in the State Police Retirement System or the Kentucky Employees Retirement System; and

The department shall not pay health insurance contributions to the state health insurance plan for individuals employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, to establish vacation, bereavement, and sick leave and holiday pay for Trooper R Class and CVE R Class employees.

Individuals employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class shall be employed on a contractual basis and shall be provided due process pursuant to KRS

16.140

or

16.192

for any disciplinary action imposed by the commissioner. A decision by the commissioner to not renew a contract shall not be considered a disciplinary action for purposes of this section.

The provisions of this section shall not eliminate or reduce any requirements under KRS

61.637

for the department to pay employer contributions to the retirement systems or to reimburse the retirement systems for the cost of retiree health, on any individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 59, § 14, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 64, § 3, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 6, § 8, effective March 30, 2016; 2016 ch. 110, § 10, effective July 15, 2016; 2016 ch. 109, § 9, effective July 15, 2016; 2019 ch. 194, § 3, effective April 9, 2019; 2022 ch. 152, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2016). This statute was amended in 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 109, sec. 9 and ch. 110, sec. 10. 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 110, sec. 15 provided that ch. 110 takes precedence over ch. 109. Chapter 110 was also the later-passed bill. Therefore, 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 110, sec. 10 has been codified and 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 109, sec. 9 has not. This statute was also amended by 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 6, sec. 8. 2016 Ky. Acts chs. 6 and 110 do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

16.199.
Trooper R Class or commercial vehicle enforcement officer R Class to adhere to agency standards of conduct and policy — Complaints.

All individuals employed as a Trooper R Class or commercial vehicle enforcement officer R class shall adhere to the agency standards of conduct and policy.

Any person may proffer charges against an individual employed as a Trooper R Class or commercial vehicle enforcement officer R class by submitting a written complaint, signed by the complainant, with the Office of Internal Affairs within the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 59, § 15, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 64, § 4, effective June 25, 2013.